Vermont statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 55. State Teachers’ Retirement System of Vermont

§ 1931.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Accumulated contributions” shall mean the sum of all the amounts deducted from the compensation of a member and credited to his or her individual account in the Pension Fund, together with regular interest thereon, as provided in subsection 1944(b) of this title.

“Actuarial equivalent” shall mean a benefit of equal value under the actuarial assumptions last adopted by the Retirement Board under subsection 1943a(h) of this title.

“Annuity” shall mean annual payments for life derived from the accumulated contributions of a member.

“Average final compensation” shall mean:

The average annual earnable compensation of a member during the three consecutive fiscal years beginning July 1 and ending June 30 of creditable service affording the highest average, or during all of the years of creditable service if fewer than three years. If the member’s highest three years of earnable compensation are the three years prior to separation of service and the member separates prior to the end of a fiscal year, the average final compensation shall be determined by adding:

the actual earnable compensation earned in the fiscal year of separation through the date of separation and the corresponding service credit;

the earnable compensation and service credit earned in the preceding two fiscal years; and

the remaining service credit that is needed to complete the three full years, which shall be factored from the fiscal year preceding the two fiscal years described in subdivision (ii) of this subdivision (A). The earnable compensation associated with this remaining service credit shall be calculated by multiplying the annual earnable compensation reported by the remaining service credit that is needed.

A member who works less than full-time shall have his or her reported earnable compensation annualized for purposes of determining average final compensation.

An increase in compensation in excess of 10 percent in any of the years used to calculate average final compensation shall be excluded. For purposes of calculating average final compensation for any member, payments made in lieu of benefits shall not be considered part of a member’s average final compensation. For purposes of determining average final compensation for group C members, unused annual or sick leave, termination bonuses, and any other compensation for service not actually performed shall also be excluded.

“Beneficiary” shall mean any person in receipt of a pension, an annuity, a retirement allowance or other benefit as provided by the System.

“Board” shall mean the board of trustees of the System provided for in section 1942 of this title to administer the System.

“Creditable service” shall mean membership service, any other service allowable under this chapter, and service transferred under

3 V.S.A. § 495

.

“Earnable compensation” shall mean the full rate of compensation for the performance of professional services paid to a teacher when the teacher works the full normal working time for his or her position, in whatever manner paid, plus all additional wages received by a teacher for duties performed that provide direct educational value to the students. Long-term disability benefits, as long as the teacher remains in an employment relationship with the school district, shall be included.

“Medical Board” shall mean the board of physicians provided for in subsection 1942(k) of this title.

“Member” shall mean any person included in the System pursuant to section 1933 of this chapter.

“Group A member”: any person who is first included in the membership of the System prior to July 1, 1981.

“Group C member”: any person who is first included in the membership of the System on or after July 1, 1990, any person who was a Group B member on June 30, 1990 who was in service on that date, and any person who was a Group B member on June 30, 1990 who was absent from service on that date who returns to service on or after July 1, 1990.

“Membership service” shall mean service as a member for which credit is allowable as provided in subsection 1936(a) of this title.

“Pension” shall mean annual payments for life derived from money provided by the State.

[Repealed.]

“Regular interest” shall mean interest at such rate as may be established from time to time by the Board as provided in subsection 1943(b) of this title.

“Retirement” shall mean withdrawal from active service with a retirement allowance granted under the provisions of this chapter.

“Retirement allowance” or “maximum allowance” shall mean the sum of the annuity and the pension. All retirement allowances shall be payable in monthly installments; provided, however, that if the retirement allowance is less than $20.00 per month, it may be paid, at the discretion of the Board of Trustees, in quarterly or semi-annual installments or in a lump sum of equivalent actuarial value.

“Service” shall mean all service as a teacher for which compensation is received.

“State” shall mean the State of Vermont.

“System” or “Retirement System” shall mean the State Teachers’ Retirement System of Vermont, as defined in section 1932 of this title.

“Teacher” shall mean any licensed teacher, principal, supervisor, superintendent, or any professional licensed by the Vermont Standards Board for Professional Educators who is regularly employed, or otherwise contracted if following retirement, for the full normal working time for his or her position in a public day school or school district within the State, or in any school or teacher-training institution located within the State, controlled by the State Board of Education, and supported wholly by the State; or in certain public independent schools designated for such purposes by the Board in accordance with section 1935 of this title. In all cases of doubt, the Board shall determine whether any person is a teacher as defined in this chapter. It shall not mean a person who is teaching with an emergency license.

“Pension Fund” or “Vermont Teachers’ Retirement Fund” shall mean the Fund created by section 1944 of this title.

“Benefits Fund” or “Retired Teachers’ Health and Medical Benefits Fund” shall mean the Fund created pursuant to section 1944b of this title.

HISTORY:

Amended

1981, No. 41

, § 23;

1989, No. 78

, § 2;

1989, No. 169

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 1, 2;

1991, No. 24

, § 11;

1991, No. 64

, § 6, eff. June 18, 1991;

1991, No. 24

7

(Adj. Sess.), § 7;

1995, No. 36

, §§ 3, 4;

2003, No. 122

(Adj. Sess.), § 297d;

2005, No. 214

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2007, No. 13

, § 22;

2007, No. 13

7 (Adj. Sess.), § 4;

2009, No. 24

, § 5;

2009, No. 74

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2013, No. 22

, § 10;

2017, No. 165

(Adj. Sess.), § 7.

§ 1932.
Date of establishment; power and privileges; name.

A retirement system is hereby established and placed under the management of the Board of Trustees of the System for the purpose of providing retirement allowances and other benefits under the provisions of this chapter for teachers of the State of Vermont. The System shall begin operation and be established as of July 1, 1947. It shall have the power and privileges of a corporation and shall be known as the “State Teachers’ Retirement System of Vermont,” and by such name all of its business shall be transacted, all of its assets invested, and all of its cash and securities and other property held in trust for the purpose for which received.

HISTORY:

Amended

2007, No. 13

, § 23.

§ 1933.
Members generally.

Membership in the System shall be a condition of employment for all teachers. A person shall not join the System as a Group A member. A person shall not join the system as a Group B member after June 30, 1990. A service shall not be included in the creditable service of any member unless the member was a member at the time the service was performed or is entitled to credit under section 1936 or 1944 of this title or was transferred under

3 V.S.A. § 495

.

, (c)[Repealed.]

(d)

Should any Group A or Group C member who has less than five years of creditable service in any period of seven consecutive years after last becoming a member be absent from service more than six years, or should a member withdraw the member’s accumulated contributions or die or retire under the provisions of this chapter, the member shall thereupon cease to be a member. However, the membership of any teacher granted leave of absence by the member’s school board for the purpose of professional study or for the acceptance of an exchange position shall be continued during such leave of absence subject to Board rules, if the member does not withdraw the member’s contributions, if any, and such member shall be considered in the service of the State for the purposes of the System during such leave of absence. In the case of leaves of absence granted by a member’s school board for purposes other than for professional study or for an exchange position, service credit shall be granted upon a contribution by the member or the member’s school board. Such contribution shall be made at the member’s current rate multiplied by the member’s earnable compensation for the year preceding the leave of absence.

(e)

[Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Amended

1961, No. 163

;

1961, No. 223

, eff. July 18, 1961;

1963, No. 110

, § 5, eff. May 28, 1963;

1965, No. 84

, § 1;

1969, No. 62

;

1969, No. 215

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1971, No. 201

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1973, No. 141

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1977, No. 53

, § 3, eff. April 23, 1977;

1981, No. 41

, § 24;

1981, No. 189

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. April 22, 1982;

1989, No. 169

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

1991, No. 64

, § 7;

2013, No. 22

, § 11;

2017, No. 165

(Adj. Sess.), § 8;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 82.

§ 1934.
Repealed. 2017, No. 165 (Adj. Sess.), § 29.

§ 1935.
Teachers in certain public or independent schools.

The Board of Trustees may designate certain public or independent schools, which are located within the State, and supported wholly or in part by the State but which are not under the control of the State Board of Education, as employers of teachers within the meaning of this chapter.

At any time within 75 days following the date of such designation, any person employed on the date of designation in a teaching capacity by such institution and who is not then a member of the System may become a member of the System by filing with the Board of Trustees, on a form prescribed by the Board, an application to be covered in the membership of the System.

-(f) [Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Amended

1963, No. 69

;

1991, No. 24

, § 11;

2007, No. 13

, § 25;

2017, No. 165

(Adj. Sess.), § 9.

§ 1936.
Creditable service; military service.

Each member shall receive membership service credit for all service rendered while a member of the System since he or she became a member, or since he or she last became a member in the event of a break in his or her membership.

[Repealed.]

Creditable service shall consist of membership service credit, any other service allowable under this chapter, and service transferred under

3 V.S.A. § 495

.

Credit shall also be granted for any period of absence from service due to any class of military service of the United States approved by the Retirement Board, provided the member returns to service as a teacher as defined under section 1931 of this title within 90 days after having become discharged or separated from military service, as if such service had been service as a teacher. The earnable compensation of the teacher at the time of entering such military service shall be deemed to be the earnable compensation for the period of such service.

Credit shall also be granted for any period of absence from service in connection with an approved workers’ compensation claim as a result of a work-related injury, provided the employee provides evidence of the period covered by the approved workers’ compensation claim upon return to active service. The earnable compensation of the employee at the time of entering the absence from service resulting from an approved workers’ compensation claim or the wages plus all other wage replacement compensation received while on the approved period of absence, whichever provides for the highest total compensation, shall be deemed to be the earnable compensation for the period of service. The total compensation under this subsection shall not exceed what the earnable compensation would have been had the member not been injured.

HISTORY:

Amended

1977, No. 53

, §§ 1, 5, eff. April 23, 1977;

2001, No. 29

, § 4;

2007, No. 13

, § 26;

2017, No. 165

(Adj. Sess.), § 10.

§ 1937.
Service retirement.

Upon written application to the Board not later than 90 days, or longer for good cause shown, after the date upon which the retirement allowance is to begin:

any Group A member may retire on a service retirement allowance on the first day of the calendar month next following the member’s separation from service, provided that the member shall have attained age 60, and following completion of five years of creditable service for those members hired on or after July 1, 2004, or have completed 30 years of creditable service at the date of the member’s retirement;

any Group C member, having attained the age of 57 or completed 25 years of creditable service as of June 30, 2010, may retire on a service retirement allowance on the first day of the calendar month next following the member’s separation from service, provided that such member shall have attained age 62, and following completion of five years of creditable service for those members who are hired on or after July 1, 2004, or have completed 30 years of creditable service at the date of the member’s retirement; and

any Group C member not having attained the age of 57 or completed 25 years of creditable service as of June 30, 2010, may retire on a service retirement allowance on the first day of the calendar month next following the member’s separation from service, provided that the member shall have completed five years of creditable service and either has attained the age of 65 or has at least 90 years of combined age and years of creditable service at the date of the member’s retirement.

Upon service retirement, a Group A member shall receive a service retirement allowance that shall consist of:
(b) (1) Upon service retirement, a Group A member shall receive a service retirement allowance that shall consist of:

an annuity, which shall be the actuarial equivalent of the member’s accumulated contributions at the time of retirement except as subdivisions 1937(b)(4) and 1944(b)(2) of this title increase the annuity; and

a pension, which shall be equal to one-120th of the member’s average final compensation multiplied by the number of years of the member’s membership service.

Beginning on July 1, 1989, the service retirement allowance shall be not less than the larger of $4,550.00 a year or 50 percent of the member’s average final compensation for any member or beneficiary who has completed 30 years or more of creditable service, nor less than a proportionate amount thereof for any member or beneficiary who has completed less than 30 years of creditable service. Beginning on March 1, 1998, the service retirement allowance shall be not less than the larger of $6,600.00 a year or 50 percent of the member’s average final compensation for any member or beneficiary who has completed 30 years or more of creditable service, nor less than a proportionate amount thereof for any member or beneficiary who has completed at least five years, but less than 30 years, of creditable service. For this purpose, any annuity derived from the member’s contributions transferred from the existing system under subsection 1934(c) of this title and from additional contributions made under subdivisions 1944(b)(5) and (6) of this title shall not be included as part of the retirement allowance. Beginning on September 1, 2006, the service retirement allowance shall be not less than the larger of $9,000.00 per year or 50 percent of the member’s average final compensation for any member or beneficiary who has completed 30 years or more of creditable service nor less than a proportionate amount thereof for any member or beneficiary who has completed at least five years but less than 30 years of creditable service. Beginning on September 1, 2011, and on September 1 of every fifth year thereafter, the minimum service retirement allowance shall be increased by $1,000.00.

, (4)[Repealed.]

Upon service retirement, a Group C member shall receive a service retirement allowance as follows:

for a member having attained the age of 57 or completed 25 years of creditable service as of June 30, 2010, the sum of:

1-1/4 percent of the member’s average final compensation multiplied by years of creditable service prior to July 1, 1990;

1-2/3 percent of the member’s average final compensation multiplied by years of creditable service on and after July 1, 1990 through June 30, 2010, to a maximum of 50 percent of average final compensation; and

1-2/3 percent of the member’s average final compensation multiplied by years of creditable service, 2 of which shall be membership service, on or after July 1, 2010, to a maximum of 53.34 percent of average final compensation;

for a member having neither attained the age of 57 nor completed 25 years of creditable service as of July 1, 2010, the sum of:

1-1/4 percent of the member’s average final compensation multiplied by years of creditable service prior to July 1, 1990;

1-2/3 percent of the member’s average final compensation multiplied by the member’s years of creditable service between July 1, 1990 and June 30, 2010; and

1-2/3 percent of the member’s average final compensation times the member’s creditable service on or after July 1, 2010 until attainment of 20 years of creditable service, and two percent of the member’s average final compensation multiplied by the member’s years of creditable service in excess of 20 years, to a maximum of 60 percent of average final compensation.

Upon written application to the Board, any Group A member who has not attained age 60 but who has attained age 55 may retire on an early retirement allowance on the first day of the calendar month next following the filing of the application or the member’s separation from service, whichever date is later, provided that the applicant has notified the superintendent of schools in writing 30 calendar days prior to the effective date of the application.

Upon early retirement a Group A member shall receive an early retirement allowance, which shall be the actuarial equivalent of:

a normal retirement allowance payable at normal retirement date, based on the member’s average final compensation at early retirement and the number of years of creditable service the member would have completed had the member remained in service to the member’s normal retirement date; multiplied by

the ratio that the number of the member’s years of creditable service at early retirement bear to the number of years of such service the member would have completed had the member remained in service to the member’s normal retirement date.

Upon written application to the Board:

any Group C member who has attained the age of 57 or completed at least 25 years of creditable service as of June 30, 2010, has not attained the age of 62 but has attained the age of 55 and completed between five and 30 years of creditable service may retire on an early retirement allowance on the first day of the calendar month next following the filing of the application or the member’s separation from service, whichever date is later;

any Group C member who has not attained the age of 57 or completed at least 25 years of creditable service as of June 30, 2010, and neither has attained the age of 65 nor has at least 90 years of combined age and years of creditable service, but who has attained age 55 and completed five years of creditable service, may retire on an early retirement allowance on the first day of the calendar month next following the filing of the application or the member’s separation from service, whichever date is later.

Upon early retirement, a Group C member:

who has attained the age of 57 or completed at least 25 years of creditable service as of June 30, 2010 shall receive an early retirement allowance equal to the service retirement allowance reduced by one-half of one percent for each month the member is under age 62 at the time of early retirement;

who has not attained the age of 57 or completed at least 25 years of creditable service as of June 30, 2010, and neither has attained the age of 65 nor has at least 90 years of combined age and years of creditable service, shall receive an early retirement allowance, which shall be the actuarial equivalent of the normal retirement allowance computed under subsection (c) of this section, based on the average final compensation and years of creditable service at the date of early retirement.

Any member who retires prior to age 62 may, at any time prior to the date the first payment on account of the member’s retirement allowance normally becomes due, elect to convert the retirement allowance otherwise payable to the member after retirement into a reduced retirement allowance that is its actuarial equivalent and is of such amount that, with the member’s primary insurance amount under Title II of the Social Security Act, the member will receive, so far as possible, the same amount each year before and after such primary insurance amount commences.

When a member has a minimum of 25 years of creditable service, he or she may elect to purchase up to five years of additional service credit. A member who has attained the age of 57 and completed at least 25 years of creditable service as of June 30, 2010 and makes an election under this subsection shall deposit in the Pension Fund by a single contribution an amount computed at regular interest to be sufficient to provide at normal retirement an annuity equal to one and two-thirds percent of the member’s average final compensation multiplied by the number of years purchased. A member who has not attained the age of 57 or completed at least 25 years of creditable service as of June 30, 2010 and makes an election under this subsection shall deposit in the Pension Fund by a single contribution an amount computed at regular interest to be sufficient to provide at normal retirement an annuity equal to one and two-thirds percent of the member’s average final compensation for each year up to 20 years of service and two percent of the member’s average final compensation for each year thereafter. If through a negotiated agreement or binding contract, a school district or supervisory union is required to purchase the whole or part of the additional years of service credit necessary to enable the member to take normal retirement, the school district or supervisory union may deposit a single contribution into the Pension Fund or make the contribution in four equal annual payments on dates established by the State Treasurer. If a school district or supervisory union elects to make the contribution in four equal annual payments, it shall, in addition, pay interest at the actuarially assumed interest rate at the time of each annual payment. Any payment not received within 30 days after the date it is due shall be considered delinquent and the delinquent payment and interest may be recovered by action in a court of competent jurisdiction against the school district or supervisory union liable therefor or may be deducted by the State Treasurer from any other monies payable to such school district or supervisory union by the State or any department or agency thereof.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 72

, §§ 1, 2, eff. April 1, 1959;

1961, No. 85

, § 1;

1963, No. 182

, § 1;

1967, No. 172

, § 1;

1969, No. 72

;

1971, No. 201

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 1, 3;

1973, No. 5

;

1973, No. 141

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1977, No. 38

;

1981, No. 41

, § 25;

1989, No. 78

, § 5;

1989, No. 169

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

1993, No. 33

, § 2;

1997, No. 68

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. March 1, 1998;

1999, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 3, 8;

2003, No. 122

(Adj. Sess.), § 297e;

2005, No. 163

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

2007, No. 13

, § 27;

2009, No. 74

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2009, No. 139

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

2017, No. 165

(Adj. Sess.), § 11.

§ 1938.
Disability retirement.

Upon notice not later than 90 days subsequent to the date the member may have separated from service, any member who has had five or more years of creditable service and has served as a teacher in the State during the five years immediately preceding the date of such separation from service, may be retired by the Board of Trustees on a disability retirement allowance on the first day of the calendar month next following receipt of application, provided such application is filed not less than 30 nor more than one 180 days subsequent to the filing of such notice, or on the first day of the calendar month next following the member’s separation from service provided such application is filed prior to such separation, and further provided that the Medical Board, after a medical examination of such member, shall certify that the member is mentally or physically incapacitated for ordinary service; and, if previously separated from service, that such incapacity has existed since the time of the member’s separation from such service; and that such incapacity is likely to be permanent.

Anything to the contrary notwithstanding, should the Board of Trustees of the State Teachers’ Retirement System determine, within its sole discretion, that a member of said System had failed for good cause to file the notice or application required by subsection (a) of this section, within the time limits prescribed, said Board may permit the filing of such notice or application at any time prior to termination of membership and may thereupon act upon such notice or application as if it had been filed within the time limits prescribed by the subsection.

Upon disability retirement a member shall receive a service retirement equal to the normal retirement benefit accrued to the effective date of the disability retirement, provided, however, that such allowance shall not be less than 25 percent of his or her average final compensation at the time of his or her disability.

Once each year during the first five years following the retirement of a member on a disability retirement allowance, and once in every three-year period thereafter, the Board of Trustees may, and upon his or her application shall, require any disability beneficiary who has not reached his or her normal retirement date to undergo a medical examination by a Medical Board or by a physician or physicians designated by the Medical Board, such examination to be made at the place of residence of such beneficiary or other place mutually agreed upon. Should any disability beneficiary who has not reached his or her normal retirement date refuse to submit to such medical examination, his or her allowance may be discontinued until his or her withdrawal of such refusal, and should his or her refusal continue for one year, all his or her rights in and to his or her pension may be revoked by the Board of Trustees.

Should the Medical Board report and certify to the Board of Trustees that any disability beneficiary has a residual functional capacity that might enable the beneficiary to return to work, and should the Board of Trustees reasonably conclude that the beneficiary is engaged in or is, as a result of specific findings made by a certified vocational counselor, able to engage in a gainful occupation paying more than the difference between the beneficiary’s retirement allowance and his or her average final compensation at retirement, the beneficiary’s pension may be reduced to an amount that, together with his or her annuity and the amount earnable by him or her, shall equal the beneficiary’s average final compensation at retirement, adjusted for inflation each year following retirement, provided that:

The Board of Trustees shall provide written notice and an opportunity to be heard to the beneficiary prior to any reduction of the beneficiary’s pension under this subsection.

If the beneficiary has engaged in a gainful occupation subsequent to receiving disability retirement, the Board of Trustees in its discretion may reject in whole or in part a vocational assessment of the beneficiary’s ability to engage in a more gainful occupation and may rely in whole or in part on evidence of the beneficiary’s actual earnings in determining the amount earnable by the beneficiary. In addition, if the Board of Trustees’ determination is based in whole or in part on a vocational assessment of the ability to engage in a gainful occupation, the beneficiary shall be given a reasonable opportunity, not to exceed two years, to seek gainful occupation prior to any change in his or her retirement allowance. Not later than 60 days before the change in retirement allowance is to occur, at the conclusion of the period of a reasonable opportunity to seek gainful occupation, the beneficiary may petition the Board of Trustees for an extension of that period. An extension will be granted only where the beneficiary can demonstrate reasonable diligence in seeking gainful employment and that a substantial hardship will result from a change in the retirement allowance. The Board of Trustees shall render a decision at least five days before the change in retirement allowance is set to occur. In the event that the beneficiary is subsequently restored to service as a teacher as set forth in subsection 1939(a) of this chapter, the beneficiary’s retirement allowance shall cease, effective on the date when reemployment commences.

Every recipient of disability benefits who has not reached his or her normal retirement date shall, annually on a date determined by the Board of Trustees, file with the State Treasurer a statement certifying, under penalty of perjury and in such form as the Board of Trustees shall prescribe, the full amount of his or her earnings from earned income during the preceding calendar year. The State Treasurer may request, and the beneficiary shall provide within 60 days after such request, additional financial information and records pertinent to the beneficiary’s earned income. The beneficiary’s statement and accompanying forms and schedules and any other financial information and records provided by the beneficiary to the State Treasurer shall be confidential. In the event that a beneficiary fails to submit the certification or any required or requested financial information or records pertinent to the beneficiary’s earned income, the beneficiary’s retirement allowance shall be suspended until all such information and records have been submitted, and in the event that the failure continues for one year, the suspension shall include all the beneficiary’s rights in and to his or her pension. Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, if the beneficiary’s earned income for the preceding year exceeded the difference between the beneficiary’s retirement allowance and his or her average final compensation at retirement, adjusted for inflation each year following retirement, the beneficiary shall refund the portion of the preceding year’s retirement allowance that is equal to the amount of the reduction specified in subsection (e) of this section, and the refund amount may be offset against the beneficiary’s monthly pension benefits. Prior to suspension or revocation of the beneficiary’s retirement allowance, reemployment rights, or inception of any offset under this subsection, the Board of Trustees shall provide the beneficiary with written notice and an opportunity to be heard.

If a disability beneficiary engages in gainful occupation paying more than the difference between his or her retirement allowance and his or her average final compensation at retirement, the Board of Trustees may, under uniform standards of economic need, reduce and from time to time adjust his or her pension to an amount that, together with his or her annuity and the amount earnable by him or her, equals his or her average final compensation at retirement. For the purposes of this subsection, “retirement allowance” means the allowance payable without optional modification as provided in section 1941 of this title, and does not include any part of the annuity not provided by the regular contributions of the member at the rate provided under subdivision 1944(b)(2) of this title.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 72

, § 3, eff. April 1, 1959;

1961, No. 85

, § 2;

1963, No. 110

, § 1, eff. May 28, 1963;

1963, No. 182

, § 2;

1967, No. 172

, § 2;

1973, No. 141

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

1981, No. 41

, § 26;

1993, No. 33

, § 3;

1999, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.), § 9;

2017, No. 165

(Adj. Sess.), § 12.

§ 1938a.
Benefit denial; evidentiary hearing.

An applicant for disability retirement benefits under section 1938 of this title may file a request for an evidentiary hearing with the Board of Trustees if the application for benefits is denied.

The hearing shall be conducted by a hearing officer designated by the Board and in conformance with rules adopted by the Board. Rules adopted by the Board shall be consistent with

3 V.S.A. § 809

.

The decision of the hearing officer shall constitute final administrative action.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 38

, § 6.

§ 1939.
Restoration to service.

In any fiscal year in which a beneficiary resumes service, as that term is defined in section 1931 of this title, he or she shall again become a member of the System, shall contribute at the rate established for members of his or her group and shall not be entitled to receive a retirement allowance, if he or she is:

compensated in excess of the allowable number of days per school year as established by the Board for substitute teaching; or

receives compensation in excess of 60 percent of the average compensation in the teacher System.

If a person once again becomes a member under subsection (a) of this section, membership shall be retroactive to the beginning of the fiscal year in which the person resumed service and the member shall not be entitled to any retirement allowance received during that fiscal year. If the person received a retirement allowance during the fiscal year in which he or she resumed service, upon subsequent retirement the Board shall suspend his or her retirement allowance for a period necessary to reimburse the System for the total retirement allowance received during the period in which the beneficiary resumed service and became a member.

Upon subsequent retirement of a person who once again becomes a member under subsection (a) of this section, the beneficiary’s former retirement allowance shall be restored, but the beneficiary shall not be entitled to cost of living adjustments for the period during which he or she was restored to service. In addition to the former retirement allowance, a beneficiary shall be entitled to a retirement allowance separately computed for the period beginning with his or her last restoration to service for which the member has made a contribution.

HISTORY:

Amended

1963, No. 110

, § 2, eff. May 28, 1963;

1973, No. 141

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

1981, No. 41

§ 27;

1995, No. 36

, § 5;

1999, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.), § 10.